Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1160.
do enact as follows:SB1160,11Section 1. 165.502 of the statutes is created to read:SB1160,2,42165.502 Civil rights violations. (1) The attorney general or his or her 3designee may bring a civil action in the name of the state whenever he or she has 4reasonable cause to believe that any of the following applies:SB1160,2,85(a) A person has engaged in a pattern or practice of conduct that violates any 6of the rights secured by the U.S. Constitution or the Wisconsin Constitution or any 7right secured by the laws of Wisconsin relating to housing, employment, education, 8or public accommodations.SB1160,2,129(b) A person has been denied a right secured by the U.S. Constitution or the 10Wisconsin Constitution or a right secured by the laws of Wisconsin relating to 11housing, employment, education, or public accommodations, and that denial raises 12an issue of general public importance.SB1160,2,1713(2) Prior to initiating a civil action under sub. (1), the attorney general or his 14or her designee may conduct an investigation to determine whether there is 15reasonable cause to believe that a violation described in sub. (1) has occurred. In 16the course of an investigation under this subsection, the attorney general or his or 17her designee may do any of the following:SB1160,2,2018(a) Require any person to file a statement or report in writing under oath or 19otherwise, as to all information the attorney general or his or her designee may 20consider necessary to the investigation.SB1160,3,31(b) Access and copy any document, or any part thereof, that is in the 2possession or under the control of any person, if such document, or such part 3thereof, is relevant to an investigation under this subsection.SB1160,3,54(c) Examine under oath any person who is alleged to have participated in or to 5have knowledge of the alleged violation.SB1160,3,76(d) Issue and cause to be served a subpoena, in substantially the form 7authorized under s. 885.02, upon any person to aid in the investigation.SB1160,3,98(e) File a petition in circuit court for enforcement of a demand or subpoena 9under pars. (a) to (d).SB1160,3,1010(3) In an action under sub. (1), a court may take any of the following actions:SB1160,3,1411(a) Award injunctive relief, including a temporary restraining order and 12preliminary and permanent injunctive relief, declaratory relief, a writ of mandamus 13or prohibition, or other such legal or equitable relief as may be appropriate to 14compel compliance with the law.SB1160,3,1815(b) Award other appropriate relief, including court costs, reasonable and 16necessary costs of investigation, reasonable and necessary costs of prosecution, 17including attorney fees, and an award of damages as may be proved to persons who 18suffered a harm caused by a violation described in sub. (1).SB1160,3,2019(c) To vindicate the public interest, assess a civil forfeiture against the 20defendant as follows:SB1160,3,21211. For a first violation, an amount not to exceed $50,000.SB1160,3,23222. For each subsequent violation committed within a 7-year period, an 23amount not to exceed $100,000.SB1160,4,21(4) A civil action under sub. (1) shall be commenced within 5 years after the 2occurrence or termination of the alleged violation or be barred.SB1160,4,93(5) In lieu of commencing a civil action under sub. (1), the attorney general or 4his or her designee may allow a person alleged to have engaged in a violation 5described in sub. (1) to enter into an assurance of voluntary compliance with 6respect to the alleged violation. An assurance entered into under this subsection 7shall not be considered evidence of a violation described in sub. (1), but violation of 8such an assurance shall be treated as a violation described in sub. (1) and is subject 9to all remedies and penalties provided in sub. (3).SB1160,4,1010